Missouri, session 2026, HB3172.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 37, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 37.1110, to read as follows:
37.1110. 1. This section shall be known and may be cited as the "State Fiscal
Responsibility Preservation Act".
2. All state departments shall exhaust all funding sources including, but not
limited to, federal funds, dedicated funds, or any other source of funding before
spending funds allocated from general revenue.
3. The provisions of this section shall not apply to federal funds that require
matching funds to be allocated by the state.
✔
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.